test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-puuraz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pūŗaz: # Noun 174 'eng /est puri/fin' - full paradigm
     pūŗaz+N+Sg+Nom: pūŗaz
     pūŗaz+N+Sg+Gen: puŗŗõ
     pūŗaz+N+Sg+Par: pūŗazt
     pūŗaz+N+Sg+Dat: puŗŗõn
     pūŗaz+N+Sg+Ins: puŗŗõks
     pūŗaz+N+Sg+Ill: [puŗŗõ, puŗŗõz]
     pūŗaz+N+Sg+Ela: puŗŗõst
     pūŗaz+N+Pl+Nom: puŗŗõd
     pūŗaz+N+Pl+Gen: puŗŗõd
     pūŗaz+N+Pl+Par: puŗŗidi
     pūŗaz+N+Pl+Dat: puŗŗõdõn
     pūŗaz+N+Pl+Ins: puŗŗõdõks
     pūŗaz+N+Pl+Ill: puŗriž
     pūŗaz+N+Pl+Ela: puŗŗist
